Utah statutes.
64-13-43.   Use of state vehicles by department personnel.

The department executive director may authorize the use of a state vehicle for official and commute purposes for a department employee who:

(1)  supervises probationers or parolees; or

(2)  investigates the criminal activity of inmates, probationers, or parolees.



Enacted by Chapter 368, 2008 General Session

